Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1007
Utility; initiate and administer loans.

A utility may make loans pursuant to sections 66-1001 to 66-1011 and may contract with banks, financial experts, and such other advisors as may be necessary in its judgment to initiate and administer the loans.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 20.